District of Columbia statutes.
4-1371.13

Immunity from liability for making reports.

Any person, hospital, or institution participating in good faith in the making of a report pursuant to this subchapter shall have immunity from liability, administrative, civil, and criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed with respect to the making of the report. The same immunity shall extend to participation in any judicial proceeding involving the report. In all administrative, civil, or criminal proceedings concerning the child or resulting from the report, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the maker of the report acted in good faith.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4613, 48 DCR 6981
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-20, September 6, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 9090).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 13 of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-40, April 25, 2001, 48 DCR 5917).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 13 of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-82, July 9, 2001, 48 DCR 6355).